District of Columbia statutes.
23-1109

Giving advance information of proposed raid prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any police officer or other public official, in advance of any raid by police or other peace officers or public officials or the execution of any search warrant or warrant of arrest, to give or furnish, either directly or indirectly, any information concerning the proposed raid or arrest to any person engaged in any manner in the bonding business, or to any attorney at law; but it shall not be unlawful for any police or other peace officer, in conducting any raid or in executing any search warrant or warrant of arrest, to communicate to any attorney at law or person engaged in the bonding business, any fact necessary to enable the officer to obtain from the attorney at law or person engaged in the bonding business information necessary to enable the officer to carry out the raid or execute the process.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 638, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-1109.
1973 Ed., § 23-1109.